Idaho, session 2026, H0974.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Idaho State Police the following amounts
to be expended according to the designated programs for personnel costs from
the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
I. DIRECTOR'S OFFICE:
FROM:
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice) Fund $130,000
II. CAPITOL PROTECTIVE SERVICES:
FROM:
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice) Fund $260,000
III. INVESTIGATIONS:
FROM:
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice) Fund $2,210,000
IV. PATROL:
FROM:
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice) Fund $3,640,000
Federal Grant Fund 195,000
TOTAL $3,835,000
V. LAW ENFORCEMENT PROGRAMS:
FROM:
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice) Fund $260,000
GRAND TOTAL $6,695,000
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.